Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska71-3518
License or registration; common carrier exempt.

Nothing in the Radiation Control Act shall be deemed to require the licensing or registration by any common carrier, contract carrier, private carrier, railway freight carrier, or railway express carrier transporting, storing, or handling any of the materials described in such act in the ordinary course of such carrier's business.

Laws 1963, c. 406, § 18, p. 1306;

Laws 1987, LB 390, § 21.